Connecticut, session 2026, SB00360.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. Section 7-148cc of the general statutes is repealed and the
2 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
3 Notwithstanding [the provisions] any provision of the general
4 statutes or any special act, charter, special act charter, home rule
5 ordinance or local law, two or more municipalities may jointly perform
6 any function that each municipality may perform separately under any
7 [provisions] provision of the general statutes or of any special act,
8 charter or home rule ordinance by entering into an interlocal agreement
9 pursuant to sections 7-339a to 7-339l, inclusive. As used in this section,
10 "municipality" means any municipality, as defined in section 7-187, any
11 district, as defined in section 7-324, any metropolitan district or any
12 municipal district created under section 7-330 and located within the
13 state of Connecticut.
SB360 / File No. 277 1

SB360 File No. 277
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 7-148cc
PD Joint Favorable
SB360 / File No. 277 2

SB360 File No. 277
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill makes technical changes and does not result in a fiscal
impact.
The Out Years
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
SB360 / File No. 277 3

SB360 File No. 277
OLR Bill Analysis
SB 360
AN ACT CONCERNING MUNICIPAL ISSUES.